Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2615
Judgment or decree on award.

Upon the granting of an order confirming, modifying, or correcting an award, a judgment or decree shall be entered in conformity therewith and be enforced as any other judgment or decree. Costs of the application and of the proceedings subsequent thereto and disbursements may be awarded by the court.

Laws 1987, LB 71, § 15.